es: Tecnología de impresión: Impresión 3D; Fabricación aditiva; Sublimación; FDM; FFF; Impacto; Inyección de tinta; LED; Láser; Matriz de líneas; MEM inyección de tinta; PJP; Tinta sólida; Estereolitografía; Transferencia térmica; Otros
ro-RO: Tehnologie de imprimare: Imprimare 3D; Fabricarea de aditivi; Sublimarea vopselei; FDM; FFF; Impact; Jet de cerneală; LED; Laser; Matrice de linii; jet de cerneală MEM; PJP; Cerneală solidă; Stereolitografia; Transfer termic; Altele
sl-SI: Tehnologija tiskanja: 3D tiskanje; Aditivna proizvodnja; Sublimacija barvila; FDM; FFF; Impact; Brizgalni; LED; Laser; Linijska amtrika; MEM brizgalna; PJP; Trdno črnilo; Stereolitografija; Toplotni prenos; Drugo
ja: 印刷技術: 3Dプリント; 積層造形; 染料昇華; FDM; FFF; インパクト; インクジェット; LED; レーザー; ラインマトリクス; MEMインクジェット; PJP; 個体インク; 光造形; 熱転写; その他
nl: Printtechnologie: 3D-printen; Additieve productie; Kleursublimatie; FDM; FFF; Impact; Inkjet; Led; Laser; Lijnmatrix; MEM-inkjet; PJP; Vaste inkt; Stereolithografie; Thermische overdracht; Andere
th: เทคโนโลยีการพิมพ์: การพิมพ์ 3 มิติ; การผลิตแบบเติมเนื้อวัสดุ; การพิมพ์แบบส่งผ่านด้วยความร้อน; การพิมพ์ 3 มิติ ระบบ FDM; การพิมพ์ 3 มิติ ระบบ FFF; การพิมพ์แบบสัมผัส; การพิมพ์แบบอิงค์เจ็ท; การพิมพ์ระบบ LED; เลเซอร์; การพิมพ์ระบบ Line Matrix; การพิมพ์แบบอิงค์เจ็ท MEM; การพิมพ์ 3 มิติ ระบบ PJP; หมึกแข็ง; การพิมพ์ระบบเรซิ่น; การพิมพ์แบบถ่ายโอนความร้อน; อื่นๆ
el: Τεχνολογία εκτύπωσης: Τρισδιάστατη εκτύπωση; Κατασκευή προσθέτων; Εξάχνωση βαφής; FDM; FFF; Κρουστικός; Ψεκασμού μελάνης (Inkjet); LED; Λέιζερ; Line matrix; MEM inkjet; PJP; Στερεά μελάνη; Στερεολιθογραφία; Θερμική μεταφορά; Άλλο
ko: 인쇄 기술: 3D 프린팅; 적층 제조; 염료승화; FDM; FFF; 임팩트; 잉크젯; LED; 레이저; 라인 매트릭스; MEM 잉크젯; PJP; 고체 잉크; 스테레오리소그래피; 열전사; 기타
pt-BR: Tecnologia da impressão: Impressoras 3D; Fabricação aditiva; Sublimação de tinta; FDM; FFF; Impacto; Jato de tinta; LED; Laser; Matriz linear; Jato de tinta MEM; PJP; Tinta sólida; Estereolitografia; Transferência térmica; Outro
hu: Nyomtatási technológia: 3D nyomtatás; Additív gyártás; Festékszublimáció; FDM; FFF; Mechanikus; Tintasugaras; LED; Lézer; Vonalmátrix; MEM tintasugaras; PJP; Szilárdtintás; Sztereolitográfia; Hőnyomtató; Egyéb
nb: Utskriftsteknologi: 3D-utskrift; Additiv produksjon; Fargesublimering; FDM; FFF; innvirkning; Inkjet; LED; Laser; Linjematrise; MEM Inkjet; PJP; Solid blekk; Stereolitografi; Termisk overføring; Annet
da: Printerteknologi: 3D-print; Additiv-fremstilling; Farvesublimering; FDM; FFF; Impact; Inkjet; LED; Laser; Linjematrix; MEM inkjet; PJP; Ensfarvet blæk; Stereolitografi; Termisk overførsel; Andet
vi: Công nghệ in: In 3D; Sản xuất bồi đắp; Chuyển nhiệt thăng hoa; FDM; FFF; In kim; In phun; LED; Laser; Ma trận dòng; In phun MEM; PJP; Mực rắn; Li-tô lập thể; Chuyển nhiệt; Khác
fr: Technologie d’impression: Impression 3D; Fabrication additive; Sublimation; FDM; FFF; Impact; Jet d’encre; LED; Laser; Matrice de ligne; Jet d’encre MEM; PJP; Encre solide; Stéréolithographie; Transfert thermique; Autre
zh-CN: 印刷技术: 3D 打印; 添加剂制造; 染料升华; FDM; FFF; 压印; 喷墨; LED; 激光; 线矩阵; MEM 喷墨; PJP; 固体墨水; 立体光刻; 烫印; 其他
pt-PT: Tecnologia de impressão: Impressão 3D; Fabricação aditiva; Sublimação de tinta; FDM; FFF; Impacto; Jato de tinta; LED; Laser; Matricial de linha; Jato de tinta MEM; PJP; Tinta sólida; Estereolitografia; Transferência térmica; Outro
sk-SK: Technológia tlače: 3D tlač; Aditívna výroba; Sublimácia farbiva; FDM; FFF; Vplyv; Atramentový; LED; Laserový; Riadková matica; MEM atramentová tlačiareň; PJP; Tuhý atrament; Stereolitografia; Tepelný prenos; Iné
zh-TW: 列印技術: 3D 列印; 積層製造; 熱昇華; 熱熔融層積列印; 熱熔融層積列印; 擊打式; 噴墨式; 發光二極體; 雷射; 矩陣; 高解析度噴墨式; 塑膠噴墨列印; 固體噴墨; 光固化; 熱轉印; 其他
cs: Technologie tisku: 3D tisk; Aditivní výroba; Sublimace barviva; FDM; FFF; Impaktní; Inkoustový; LED; Laser; Řádková matice; Inkoustový tisk MEM; PJP; Solid Ink; Stereolitografie; Termální přenos; Jiné
it: Tecnologia di stampa: Stampante 3D; Produzione additiva; Sublimazione della tintura; FDM; FFF; Impatto; Getto di inchiostro; LED; Laser; Matrice di linea; Getto di inchiostro MEM; PJP; Inchiostro solido; Stereolitografia; Trasferimento termico; Altro
de: Drucktechnologie: 3D-Druck; Additive Fertigung; Farbsublimation; FDM; FFF; Druckkraft; Inkjet; LED; Laser; Zeilenmatrix; MEM Tintenstrahl; PJP; Festtinte; Stereolithografie; Thermotransfer; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Tehnologija ispisa: 3D printanje; Aditivna proizvodnja; Sublimacija boje; FDM; FFF; Impact; Inkjet; LED; Laser; Linijska matrica; MEM inkjet; PJP; Kruta tinta; Stereolitografija; Toplinski prijenos; Ostalo
pl: Technologia druku: Drukowanie 3D; Drukowanie przestrzenne; Termosublimacyjna; FDM; FFF; Wpływ; Atramentowy; LED; Laser; Macierz linii; Drukarka atramentowa MEM; PJP; Atramentowo-pigmentowa; Stereolitografia; Transfer termiczny; Inne
ru: Технология печати: 3D-печать; Аддитивное производство; Сублимация красителя; FDM; FFF; Ударная; Струйная; Светодиодная; Лазерная; Линейно-матричная; MEM-струйная; PJP; Твердые чернила; Стереолитография; Термоперенос; Другая
en: Print technology: 3D printing; Additive manufacturing; Dye sublimation; FDM; FFF; Impact; Inkjet; LED; Laser; Line matrix; MEM inkjet; PJP; Solid ink; Stereolithography; Thermal transfer; Other
sv: Tryckteknik: 3D-utskrift; Additiv tillverkning; Färgsublimering; FDM; FFF; Påverkan; Inkjet; LED; Laser; Linjematris; Inkjet; PJP; Solid bläck; Stereolitografi; Värmeöverföring; Övrigt
lt-LT: Spausdinimo technologija: 3D spausdinimas; Adityvioji gamyba; Sublimacinis; FDM; FFF; Smūginis; Rašalinis; LED; Lazerinis; Linijinė matrica; MEM rašalinis; PJP; Kietasis rašalas; Stereolitografija; Terminis; Kita
tr: Baskı Teknolojisi: 3D baskı; Katmanlı üretim; Boya süblimasyonu; FDM; FFF; Etki; Mürekkep püskürtme; LED; Lazer; Çizgi matrisi; MEM mürekkep püskürtmeli; PJP; Katı mürekkep; Stereolitografi; Termal transfer; Diğer
bg-BG: Печатна технология: 3D принтиране; Адитивно производство; Сублимация с багрило; FDM; FFF; Въздействие; Мастиленоструен; LED; Лазерен; Линейна матрица; MEM мастиленоструен; PJP; Твърдо мастило; Стереолитография; Термотрансфер; Други
fi: Tulostustekniikka: 3D-tulostus; Lisäainevalmistus; Väriaineen sublimaatio; FDM; FFF; Lyönti; Mustesuihku; LED; Laser; Viivamatriisi; MEM-mustesuihku; PJP; Kiinteä muste; Stereolitografia; Lämmönsiirto; Muu